California statutes. Business and Professions Code
The board may make arrangements with a public or private organization to conduct the examination. The board may contract with a public or private organization for materials or services related to the examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 658, Sec. 103.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6755.

(a) Examination duration and composition shall be designed to conform to the following general principle: The first division of the examination shall test the applicant’s knowledge of appropriate fundamental engineering subjects, including mathematics and the basic sciences; the second division of the examination shall test the applicant’s ability to apply their knowledge and experience and to assume responsible charge in the professional practice of the branch of engineering in which the applicant is being examined.

(b) The board may by rule provide for a waiver of the first division of the examination for applicants whose education and experience qualifications substantially exceed the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 6751.

(c) The board may by rule provide for a waiver of any part of the second division of the examination for persons eminently qualified for licensure in this state by virtue of their standing in the engineering community, their years of experience, and those other qualifications as the board deems appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 9.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6755.1.

(a) The second division of the examination for registration as a professional engineer shall include questions to test the applicant’s knowledge of state laws and the board’s rules and regulations regulating the practice of professional engineering. The board shall administer the test on state laws and board rules regulating the practice of engineering in this state as a separate part of the second division of the examination for registration as a professional engineer.

(b) On and after April 1, 1988, the second division of the examination for registration as a civil engineer shall also include questions to test the applicant’s knowledge of seismic principles and engineering surveying principles as defined in Section 6731.1.
 No registration for a civil engineer shall be issued by the board on or after January 1, 1988, to any applicant unless they have successfully completed questions to test their knowledge of seismic principles and engineering surveying principles.

The board shall administer the questions to test the applicant’s knowledge of seismic principles and engineering surveying principles as separate parts of the second division of the examination for registration as a civil engineer.

It is the intent of the Legislature that this section confirm the authority of the board to issue registrations prior to April 1, 1988, to applicants based on examinations not testing the applicant’s knowledge of seismic principles and engineering surveying principles as defined in Section 6731.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 10.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6756.

(a) An applicant for certification as an engineer-in-training shall, upon meeting all of the requirements prescribed in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 6751, be issued a certificate as an engineer-in-training. A renewal or other fee, other than the application and examination fees, shall not be charged for this certification. The certificate shall become invalid when the holder has qualified as a professional engineer as provided in Section 6762.

(b) An engineer-in-training certificate does not authorize the holder thereof to practice or offer to practice civil, electrical, or mechanical engineering work, in his or her own right, or to use the titles specified in Sections 6732, 6736, and 6736.1.

(c) It is unlawful for anyone other than the holder of a valid engineer-in-training certificate issued under this chapter to use the title of “engineer-in-training” or any abbreviation of that title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 3.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6757.

Applicants who profess to be qualified in more than one branch of engineering shall be required to file an application for each branch in which they wish to be registered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 896.)
-------------------------------------------

6758.

An applicant failing in an examination may be examined again upon filing a new application and the payment of the examination fee fixed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 188, Sec. 5.   (SB 826)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6759.

The board, upon application therefor, on its prescribed form, and the payment of the fee fixed by this chapter, may issue a certificate of registration as a professional engineer, without written examination, to any person holding a certificate of registration issued to him or her by any state or country when the applicant’s qualifications meet the requirements of this chapter and rules established by the board. The board shall not require a comity applicant to meet any requirement not required of California applicants. For purposes of this section, equivalent second division examinations shall be written examinations prepared by or administered by a state or territory either by single or combined branch at the level generally administered by the board to persons who passed or were exempted from the first
 division examination. Applicants who have passed an equivalent second division combined branch or a single branch examination in a branch not recognized for registration in California shall be registered in the branch in which their experience and education indicate the closest relationship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 400, Sec. 11.   (SB 1467)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6762.

Any applicant for licensure as a professional engineer, upon meeting all of the requirements prescribed in subdivision (c) of Section 6751 and who has otherwise qualified hereunder as a professional engineer, shall have a certificate of registration issued to him or her as a professional engineer in the particular branch for which he or she is found qualified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 4.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6762.5.

(a) The board shall issue, upon application and payment of the fee established by Section 6799, a retired license (registration), to an engineer who has been licensed by the board for a minimum of 5 years within California and a minimum of 20 years within the United States or territory of the United States, and who holds a license that is not suspended, revoked, or otherwise disciplined, or subject to pending discipline under this chapter.

(b) The holder of a retired license issued pursuant to this section shall not engage in any activity for which an active engineer’s license is required. An engineer holding a retired license shall be permitted to use the titles “retired professional engineer,” “professional engineer, retired,” or either of those titles with the licensee’s branch designation inserted for the word “professional” for example, “retired civil engineer” or “civil engineer, retired.”

(c) The holder of a retired license shall not be required to renew that license.

(d) In order for the holder of a retired license issued pursuant to this section to restore his or her license to active status, he or she shall pass the second division examination that is required for initial licensure with the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 983, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6763.

Application for authority to use the title “structural engineer,” “soil engineer,” “soils engineer,” or “geotechnical engineer” shall be made to the board on forms prescribed by it and shall be accompanied by the fee fixed by this chapter.

An applicant for authority to use the title “structural engineer,” “soil engineer,” “soils engineer,” or “geotechnical engineer” who has passed the examination prescribed by the board, or an applicant for authority to use the title “soil engineer,” “soils engineer,” or “geotechnical engineer” whose application is submitted prior to July 1, 1986, and who has otherwise demonstrated that he or she is qualified, shall have a certificate of authority issued to him or her.

For purposes of this chapter, an authority to use the title “structural engineer,” “soil engineer,” “soils engineer,” or “geotechnical engineer” is an identification of competence and specialization in a subspecialty of civil engineering and necessitates education or experience in addition to that required for registration as a civil engineer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 415, Sec. 15.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6763.1.

An applicant to use the title “structural engineer” shall have successfully passed a written examination for structural engineering that is administered by a nationally recognized entity approved by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 448, Sec. 20.   (SB 543)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6763.5.

If an applicant for licensure as a professional engineer, for certification as an engineer-in-training, or for authorization to use the title “structural engineer” or “soil engineer” is found by the board to lack the qualifications required for admission to the examination for such licensure, certification, or authorization, the board may, in accordance with the provisions of Section 158 of this code, refund to them their examination fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 11.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6764.

Each professional engineer licensed under this chapter shall, upon licensure, obtain a seal or stamp of a design authorized by the board bearing the licensee’s name, number of his or her certificate or authority, the legend “professional engineer” and the designation of the particular branch or authority in which he or she is licensed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 368, Sec. 4.   (AB 645)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6765.

A duplicate certificate of registration to replace one lost, destroyed, or mutilated may be issued subject to the rules and regulations of the board. The duplicate certificate fee fixed by this chapter shall be charged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1709.)
-------------------------------------------

6766.

An unsuspended, unrevoked and unexpired certificate and endorsement of registry made under this chapter, is presumptive evidence in all courts and places that the person named therein is legally registered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1709.)
-------------------------------------------

6767.

(a) Each applicant for licensure or certification who has a valid email address shall report to the board that email address at the time of application.

(b) Each certificate or license holder who has a valid email address shall report that email address to the board at the time of renewal.

(c) Each applicant or certificate or license holder shall notify the board within 30 days of any change to their email address on file with the board.

(d) In the interest of protecting the privacy of applicants and certificate or license holders, the email address provided to the board pursuant to this chapter shall not be considered
 a public record and shall not be disclosed pursuant to Section 27 or pursuant to a request under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), unless required pursuant to a court order by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 302, Sec. 3.   (SB 1120)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Reporting Requirements [6770. - 6770.6.]

6770.

(a) A licensee shall report to the board in writing the occurrence of any of the following events that occurred on or after January 1, 2008, within 90 days of the date the licensee has knowledge of the event:

(1) The conviction of the licensee of any felony.

(2) The conviction of the licensee of any other crime that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a licensed professional engineer.

(3) A civil action settlement or administrative action resulting in a settlement against the
 licensee in any action alleging fraud, deceit, misrepresentation, breach or violation of contract, negligence, incompetence, or recklessness by the licensee in the practice of professional engineering if the amount or value of the settlement is
 greater than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(4) A civil action judgment or binding arbitration award or administrative action resulting in a judgment or binding arbitration award against the licensee in any action alleging fraud, deceit, misrepresentation, breach or violation of contract, negligence, incompetence, or recklessness by the licensee in the practice of professional engineering if the amount or value of the judgment or binding arbitration award is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or greater.

(b) The report required by subdivision (a) shall be signed by the licensee and set forth the facts that constitute the reportable event. If the reportable event involves the action of an administrative agency or court, the report shall set forth the
 title of the matter, court or agency name, docket number, and the date the reportable event occurred.

(c) A licensee shall promptly respond to oral or written inquiries from the board concerning the reportable events, including inquiries made by the board in conjunction with license renewal.

(d) Nothing in this section shall impose a duty upon any licensee to report to the board the occurrence of any of the events set forth in subdivision (a) either by or against any other licensee.

(e) Failure of a licensee to report to the board in the time and manner required by this section shall be grounds for disciplinary action.

(f) For the purposes of this section, a
 conviction includes the initial plea, verdict, or finding of guilt; a plea of no contest; or pronouncement of sentence by a trial court even though the conviction may not be final or sentence actually imposed until all appeals are exhausted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 471, Sec. 1.   (SB 679)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6770.1.

Within 30 days of entry of a conviction described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 6770, a settlement described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 6770, or a judgment described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 6770, by a court of this state that has been notified that the defendant is a licensee of the board, the court that rendered the conviction, settlement, or judgment shall report that fact to the board and provide the board with a copy of the conviction, settlement, or judgment and any orders or opinions of the court accompanying or ordering the
 conviction, settlement, or judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 471, Sec. 2.   (SB 679)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6770.2.

(a) Within 30 days of payment of all or any portion of any civil action judgment, settlement, or binding arbitration award described in Section 6770 against a licensee of the board, any insurer providing professional liability insurance to that licensee shall report to the board the name of the licensee; the amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or binding arbitration award; the amount paid by the insurer; and the identity of the payee.

(b) Within 30 days of payment of all or any portion of any civil action judgment, settlement, or binding arbitration award described in Section 6770 against a licensee of the board, any state or local government agency that self-insures that licensee shall report to the board the name of the licensee; the amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or binding arbitration award; the amount paid; and the identity of the payee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 471, Sec. 3.   (SB 679)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6770.3.

The requirements of Sections 6770, 6770.1, and 6770.2 shall apply if a party to the civil action, settlement, or arbitration award is or was a sole proprietorship, partnership, firm, corporation, or state or local government agency in which the licensee is or was an owner, partner, member, officer, or employee and is or was the licensee in responsible charge of that portion of the project that was the subject of the civil judgment, settlement, or arbitration award.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 691, Sec. 19.6.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section conditionally operative on January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 6770.6.)
-------------------------------------------

6770.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a licensee shall not be considered to have violated a confidential settlement agreement or other confidential agreement by providing a report to the board as required by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 691, Sec. 19.6.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section conditionally operative on January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 6770.6.)
-------------------------------------------

6770.5.

The board may adopt regulations to further define the reporting requirements of Sections 6770, 6770.1, and 6770.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 691, Sec. 19.6.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section conditionally operative on January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 6770.6.)
-------------------------------------------

6770.6.

This article shall become operative on January 1, 2008, only if an appropriation is made from the Professional Engineer’s and Land Surveyor’s Fund for the 2007–08 fiscal year in the annual Budget Act to fund the activities of this article, and sufficient hiring authority is granted to the board pursuant to a budget change proposal to provide sufficient staffing to implement this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Note: This section prescribes a conditional operative date for Article 4.5, commencing with Section 6770.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Disciplinary Proceedings [6775. - 6780.]

6775.

The board may, upon its own initiative or upon the receipt of a complaint, investigate the actions of any professional engineer licensed under this chapter and make findings thereon.

By a majority vote, the board may publicly reprove, suspend for a period not to exceed two years, or revoke the certificate of any professional engineer licensed under this chapter on any of the following grounds:

(a) Any conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a licensed professional engineer, in which case the certified record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof.

(b) Any deceit, misrepresentation, or fraud in their practice.

(c) Any negligence or incompetence in their practice.

(d) A breach or violation of a contract to provide professional engineering services.

(e) Any fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation in obtaining their certificate as a professional engineer.

(f) Aiding or abetting any person in the violation of any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(g) For a licensee who serves as a qualified professional certifier, as defined in Section 66345.1 of the Government Code, making any false
 statement in a certification submission pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 66345) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code. 

(h) A violation in the course of the practice of professional engineering of a rule or regulation of unprofessional conduct
 adopted by the board.

(i) A violation of any provision of this chapter or any other law relating to or involving the practice of professional engineering.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 470, Sec. 2.   (AB 671)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6775.1.

The board may, upon its own initiative or upon the receipt of a complaint, investigate the actions of any engineer-in-training and make findings thereon.

By a majority vote, the board may revoke the certificate of any engineer-in-training:

(a) Who has been convicted of a crime as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 480.

(b) Who has committed any act that would be grounds for denial of licensure pursuant to Section 480 or 496.

(c) Who has committed any act of fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation in obtaining his or her
 engineer-in-training certificate or certificate of registration, certification, or authority as a professional engineer.

(d) Who aids or abets any person in the violation of any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(e) Who violates Section 119 with respect to an engineer-in-training certificate.

(f) Who commits any act described in Section 6787.

(g) Who violates any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 432, Sec. 7.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6775.2.

The failure of, or refusal by, a licensee or a certificate holder to respond to a written request from a representative of the board in the investigation of a complaint against that licensee or certificate holder constitutes a cause for disciplinary action under Section 6775 or 6775.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 630, Sec. 4.   (AB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6776.

The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1006, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6777.

The board may reissue a certificate of registration, certification, or authority, to any person whose certificate has been revoked if a majority of the members of the board vote in favor of such reissuance for reasons the board deems sufficient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1709.)
-------------------------------------------

6779.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge substantially related to the qualifications, functions and duties of a registered professional engineer is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The board may order the certificate suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a certificate, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such person to withdraw his plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

6780.

(a) A petitioner may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of penalty, including reduction, modification, or termination of probation, after the following minimum periods have elapsed from the effective date of the decision ordering the disciplinary action, or if the order of the board or any portion of it is stayed by a court of law, from the date the disciplinary action is actually implemented in its entirety:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, at least three years for reinstatement of a certificate that was revoked or surrendered. However, the board may, in its sole discretion, specify in its order of revocation or surrender a lesser period of time that shall be at minimum one year.

(2) At least two years for early termination of a probation period of three years or more.

(3) At least one year for early termination of a probation period of less than three years.

(4) At least one year for reduction or modification of a condition of probation.

(b) The board shall notify the Attorney General of the filing of the petition. The petitioner and the Attorney General shall be given timely notice by letter of the time and place of the hearing on the petition, and the petitioner and the Attorney General shall be given the opportunity to present both oral and documentary evidence and argument to the board. The petitioner shall at all times have the burden of proof to establish by clear and convincing evidence that he or she is entitled to the relief sought in the petition.

(c) The board itself or an administrative law judge, if one is designated by the board, shall hear the petition and shall prepare a written decision setting forth the reasons supporting the decision.

(d) The board may grant or deny the petition or may impose any terms and conditions that it reasonably deems appropriate as a condition of reinstatement or reduction or modification of the penalty.

(e) No petition shall be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole. No petition shall be considered while there is an accusation or petition to revoke probation pending against the petitioner.

(f) The board may, in its discretion, deny without hearing or argument any petition that is filed pursuant to this section within a period of two years from the effective date of a prior decision following a hearing under this section.

(g) Judicial review of the board’s decision following a hearing under this section may be sought by way of a petition for writ of administrative mandamus pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The party seeking to overturn the board’s decision shall have the burden of proof in any mandamus proceeding. In the mandamus proceeding, if it is alleged that there has been an abuse of discretion because the board’s findings are not supported by the evidence, abuse of discretion is established if the court determines that the findings are not supported by substantial evidence in light of the whole record.

(h) The following definitions apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “Certificate” includes certificate of registration or license as a professional engineer; certificates of authority to use the titles “structural engineer,” “geotechnical engineer,” “soil engineer,” “soils engineer,” or “consulting engineer;” and certification as an engineer-in-training.

(2) “Petitioner” means a professional engineer or an engineer-in-training whose certificate has been revoked, suspended, or surrendered or placed on probation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 657, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Offenses Against the Chapter [6785. - 6789.]

6785.

The board shall have the power, duty, and authority to investigate violations of the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1709.)
-------------------------------------------

6786.

It is the duty of the respective members of the legal system to prosecute all persons charged with the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter.

It is the duty of the executive officer of the board, under the direction of the board, to aid these officers in the enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 47, Sec. 61.   Effective March 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

6787.

A person who does any of the following is guilty of a misdemeanor:

(a) Unless the person is exempt from licensure under this chapter, practices or offers to practice civil, electrical, or mechanical engineering in this state according to this chapter without legal authorization.

(b) Presents or attempts to file as the person’s own the certificate of an engineer-in-training or the certificate of licensure of a licensed professional engineer unless they are the person named on the certificate.

(c) Gives false evidence of any kind to the board, or to any board member, in obtaining a certificate as an engineer-in-training or a certificate of licensure.

(d) Impersonates or uses the seal, signature, or license number of a licensed professional engineer or uses a false license number.

(e) Impersonates or uses the certificate number of an engineer-in-training or uses a false certificate.

(f) Uses an expired, suspended, surrendered, or revoked certificate or license.

(g) Represents themselves as, or uses the title of, a licensed or registered civil, electrical, or mechanical engineer, or any other title whereby that person could be considered as practicing or offering to practice civil, electrical, or mechanical engineering in any of its branches, unless they are correspondingly qualified by licensure as a civil, electrical, or mechanical engineer under this chapter.

(h) Unless appropriately licensed, manages, or conducts as manager, proprietor, or agent, any place of business from which civil, electrical, or mechanical engineering work is solicited, performed, or practiced, except as authorized pursuant to Section 8726.1.

(i) Uses the title, or any combination of that title, of “professional engineer,” “licensed engineer,” “registered engineer,” or the branch titles specified in Section 6732, or the authority titles specified in Sections 6736 and 6736.1, or “engineer-in-training,” or makes use of any abbreviation of that title that might lead to the belief that the person is a licensed engineer, is authorized to use the titles specified in Section 6736 or 6736.1, or holds a certificate as an engineer-in-training, without being licensed, authorized, or certified as required by this chapter.

(j) Uses the title “consulting engineer” without being licensed as required by this chapter or without being authorized to use that title pursuant to legislation enacted at the 1963, 1965, or 1968 Regular Session.

(k) Violates any provision of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 12.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6788.

Any person who violates any provision of subdivisions (a) to (j), inclusive, of Section 6787 in connection with the offer or performance of engineering services for the repair of damage to a residential or nonresidential structure caused by a disaster for which a state of emergency is proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code, or for which an emergency or major disaster is declared by the President of the United States, shall be punished by a fine up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months, or for two or three years, or by both the
 fine and imprisonment, or by a fine up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 630, Sec. 6.   (AB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6789.

(a) If a licensee who is retained as an expert witness enters into a nondisclosure agreement, that agreement shall not be construed to prevent the licensee from reporting a potential violation of the Professional Engineers Act to the board.

(b) This section shall not be construed to be, or act as, a waiver of any applicable attorney-client or attorney work product privileges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 145, Sec. 1.   (SB 339)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Revenue [6795. - 6799.]

6795.

Certificates of registration as a professional engineer, and certificates of authority, shall be valid for a period of two years from the assigned date of renewal. Biennial renewals shall be staggered on a quarterly basis. To renew an unexpired certificate, the certificate holder shall, on or before the date of expiration indicated on the renewal receipt, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 9.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6795.2.

(a) At the time of renewal specified in Section 6795 or 6796, the board shall administer an assessment of the certificate holder to reinforce the certificate holder’s knowledge of state laws and the board’s rules and regulations. Failure to complete this assessment within 60 days after the date of expiration of the certificate may result in disciplinary action under Section 6775, but shall not affect
 the renewal of the certificate.

(b) The crime in subdivision (j) of Section 6787 shall not apply to this section.

(c) The board shall not charge the certificate holder a fee for the administration or development of the assessment.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “assessment” means an online program that contains educational reading material and questions. The material shall be based on state law and the board’s rules and regulations relating to the practice of professional engineers. The scope of the assessment shall be limited to the board’s
 top five types of violations related to the administrative and procedural aspects of the practice of professional engineers and any changes or additions to existing law related to such administrative and procedural aspects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 629, Sec. 1.   (SB 1085)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6796.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, certificates of registration as a professional engineer and certificates of authority may be renewed at any time within five years after expiration on filing of application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board and payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees. If the certificate is renewed more than 60 days after its expiration, the certificate holder, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this chapter. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which the renewal fee is paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever last occurs.

The expiration date of a certificate renewed pursuant to this section shall be determined pursuant to Section 6795.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 6.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6796.1.

A suspended certificate is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but such renewal does not entitle the holder of the certificate, while it remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the activity to which the certificate relates, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which it was suspended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

6796.2.

A revoked certificate is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the holder of the certificate, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

6796.3.

(a) Certificates of registration as a professional engineer, and certificates of authority to use the title “structural engineer,” “soil engineer,” or “consulting engineer” that are not renewed within five years after expiration shall not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued. After five years after expiration, the holder of a certificate may apply for and obtain a new certificate subject to the following:

(1) He or she has not committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

 (2) He or she takes and passes the examination, if any, that would be required of him or her
 if he or she were then applying for the certificate for the first time.

(b) The board may, by regulation, provide for the waiver or refund of all or any part of the application fee in those cases in which a certificate is issued without an examination pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 7.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6796.5.

Once an expired or delinquent certificate of registration or certificate of authority is renewed pursuant to Section 6796, all of the following shall apply:

(a) The board shall continue to have full jurisdiction and authority over the certificate holder as if the authority had not expired or become delinquent.

(b) The work performed by the certificate holder during a period of expiration or delinquency shall be deemed lawful and validly performed as to persons or entities other than the authority holder.

(c) The renewal of a registration or certificate of authority shall not
 affect liability issues regarding work performed during a period of expiration or delinquency, nor does the fact of performance during a period of expiration or delinquency affect liability issues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 8.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6797.

(a) The department shall receive and account for all money derived from the operation of this chapter and, at the end of each month, shall report such money to the Controller and shall pay it to the Treasurer, who shall keep the money in a separate fund known as the Professional Engineer’s, Land Surveyor’s, and Geologist’s Fund.

(b) For accounting and recordkeeping purposes, the Professional Engineer’s, Land Surveyor’s, and Geologist’s Fund shall be deemed to be a single special fund, and shall be available for expenditure only for the purposes as are now or may hereafter be provided by law.

(c) The fees and civil penalties received under
 this chapter shall be deposited in the Professional Engineer’s, Land Surveyor’s, and Geologist’s Fund. All moneys in the fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes of this chapter.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 14) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 428, Sec. 15.   (AB 177)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6798.

The board may make refunds of all fees in accordance with Section 158 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 896.)
-------------------------------------------

6799.
